Hawaii statutes.
§832-1 Definitions. Where appearing in
this chapter, the term "governor" includes any person performing the
functions of governor by authority of the laws of this State. The term "executive
authority" includes the governor, and any person performing the functions
of governor in any state, and the term "state" includes any state
other than this State, the District of Columbia, or a Territory, organized or
unorganized, of the United States. The term "interstate" means
between this State and any other state. The term "prosecuting officer"
or "prosecuting attorney" includes the attorney general of this
State, any county attorney or prosecuting attorney of any county of this
State. The term "peace officer" includes any officer authorized to
serve process in criminal proceedings. [L 1941, c 99, §1; RL 1945, §10631; RL
1955, §250-1; HRS §713-1; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Cross References

Extradition of persons of unsound mind, see chapter 337.

Case Notes

The Federated States of Micronesia is a "territory of
the United States" for purposes of extraditing criminals. 67 H. 259, 686
P.2d 16 (1984).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next